District of Columbia statutes.
40-105

Limitation on lien for storage.

To the extent that any lien provided for in this chapter is based on a claim for storage of a motor vehicle in excess of $150, such lien shall be, as to such excess, inferior to the lien of a conditional vendor or chattel mortgagee (as defined in § 40-102) claiming under an instrument recorded on a date earlier than the period to which such charges are attributable.

History

June 3, 1952, 66 Stat. 97, ch. 361, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-205.
1973 Ed., § 38-208.